Arkansas, session 2025, SB640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Reconstitution of State Library Board.
(a) The terms of the members of the State Library Board serving on the
effective date of this act shall be cut short and terminated on the effective
date of this act.
(b)(1) In place of the members whose terms were cut short and
terminated under subsection (a) of this section, the Governor shall appoint
seven (7) new members of the State Library Board whose terms shall commence
on the effective date of this act.
(2) Appointments under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall
be made in the manner under § 13-2-205.
(c) The Governor shall call the first meeting of the newly appointed
State Library Board within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this
act.
(d)(1) At the first meeting of the newly appointed State Library
Board, the members of the State Library Board shall draw lots so that:
(A) One (1) member serves a term of one (1) year;
(B) Two (2) members serve a term of three (3) years;
(C) Two (2) members serve a term of five (5) years; and
(D) Two (2) members serve a term of seven (7) years.
*LGL201*
04/09/2025 8:37:25 PM LGL201

SB640
(2) Persons subsequently appointed to the State Library Board
shall serve a term of seven (7) years.
(3) A term of a member of the newly appointed State Library
Board of less than seven (7) years shall not be considered a full term for
the purpose of § 13-2-205(b)(4)(B).































04/09/2025 8:37:25 PM LGL201